Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3403
Public defender; assistants; personnel; compensation; office space, fixtures, and supplies.

The public defender may appoint as many assistant public defenders, who shall be attorneys licensed to practice law in this state, secretaries, law clerks, investigators, and other employees as are reasonably necessary to permit him or her to effectively and competently represent the clients of the office subject to the approval and consent of the county board which shall fix the compensation of all such persons as well as the budget for office space, furniture, furnishings, fixtures, supplies, law books, court costs, and brief-printing, investigative, expert, travel, and other miscellaneous expenses reasonably necessary to enable the public defender to effectively and competently represent the clients of the office.

Laws 1972, LB 1463, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1989), § 29-1804.11;

Laws 1990, LB 822, § 3.

This section shifts the authority to set salaries for the public defender's office to the county board. Hall Cty. Pub. Defenders Organization v. County of Hall, 253 Neb. 763, 571 N.W.2d 789 (1998); State ex rel. Garvey v. County Bd. of Comm. of Sarpy County, 253 Neb. 694, 573 N.W.2d 747 (1998).

The county board has the authority to set salaries for the public defender's office. State ex rel. Garvey v. County Bd. of Comm. of Sarpy County, 253 Neb. 694, 573 N.W.2d 747 (1998).